Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 13

State and Local Government Volunteers Act

21-13-101. Title.

This chapter may be cited as the “State and Local Government Volunteers Act”.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 42, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3701.

21-13-102. Legislative intent.

Since the spirit of volunteerism has long animated generations of citizens of this state and throughout the nation to give of their time and abilities to help others, the State of Arkansas would be wise to make use of volunteers in state and local agencies whenever possible.

Effective use of volunteers in state service, however, requires that state and local agencies be provided guidelines for the development of volunteer programs and the utilization of volunteers.

The General Assembly intends by this chapter to assure that the people of Arkansas may derive optimal benefit from volunteers and that the time and talents of volunteers in state and local service may be put to the best use.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 42, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3701.

21-13-103. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Department” means all agencies, departments, institutions, and divisions of state government and agencies under the jurisdiction or supervision of the State of Arkansas or of any political subdivision or school district in this state;

“Material donor” means any person who, without financial gain, provides funds, materials, employment, or opportunities to clients of agencies, instrumentalities, political subdivisions, or school districts of the State of Arkansas;

“Occasional-service volunteer” means any person who provides a one-time or occasional volunteer service;

“Regular-service volunteer” means any person engaged in specific volunteer service activities on an ongoing or continuing basis; and

“Volunteer” means any person who, of his or her own free will, provides goods or services without any financial gain to any agency, instrumentality, political subdivision, or school district of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 42, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3702.

21-13-104. No legal claim created — Exceptions.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to provide a lawful claim or right of volunteers for meals, lodging, transportation, or liability insurance coverage, unless each of the respective departments has:

Made provision for such benefits;

Established appropriate safeguards for eligibility for the benefits; and

Determined that sufficient funds are available to the department to defray the cost of the benefits.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 42, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3705.

21-13-105. Development of programs — Use of volunteers.

Every department, through its executive head, may develop volunteer programs and accept the services of volunteers, including regular-service volunteers, occasional-service volunteers, or material donors to assist in programs carried out or administered by that department.

Each department that utilizes the services of volunteers may:

Enlist the services of the Department of Human Services to assist in the development of volunteer programs;

Take actions as are necessary and appropriate to develop meaningful opportunities for volunteers involved in those programs and to improve public services;

Develop written rules governing recruitment, training, screening, responsibility, utilization, and supervision of volunteers;

Take action as is necessary to ensure that volunteer and paid staff of each department understand their respective duties and responsibilities, their relationship to each other, and their respective roles in fulfilling the objectives of their department;

Take actions as are necessary and appropriate to assure a receptive climate to attract citizen volunteers; and

Provide for the recognition of volunteers who have offered exceptional service to the state, its political subdivisions, or school districts.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “Community Service and Nonprofit Support of” for “Volunteerism in” in (b)(1).

The 2017 amendment deleted “the Division of Community Service and Nonprofit Support of” preceding “the Department” in (b)(1).

Cross References. Division of Volunteerism, §25-10-128.

Meals may be furnished without charge to occasional-service volunteers at the discretion of the department's executive head.

Lodging, if available, may be provided temporarily at no charge to regular-service volunteers, at the discretion of each department.

(A)(i)Transportation reimbursement may be furnished to those volunteers whose presence is determined to be necessary to the department.

Rates or amounts of such reimbursement shall not exceed the allowances provided under applicable state travel rules for state departments or under applicable travel rules with respect to volunteer services rendered departments of political subdivisions and school districts.

Volunteers may utilize department vehicles in the performance of their duties, subject to the rules governing use of state vehicles by paid staff.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulation” and “regulations” in (b)(3)(A)(ii); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(3)(B).

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “shall” for “may” in (b).

Liability insurance may be provided by the department utilizing volunteer services, both to regular-service and occasional-service volunteers, to the same extent as may be provided by the department to its paid staff.

Volunteers in state service shall enjoy the protection of the state's sovereign immunity to the same extent as paid staff.

Each department that utilizes the services of volunteers may recognize prior volunteer service as partial fulfillment of state employment requirements for training and experience established under applicable personnel rules.

The Department of Finance and Administration and the personnel administrators of the respective departments shall make provision for the listing of volunteer service and experience on all future personnel forms and other records kept in the future, reflecting work history so that appropriate credit may be given in evaluating work history and in making position evaluations.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 42, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3703, 12-3704; Acts 2011, No. 42, § 3; 2017, No. 913, § 3.

21-13-106. Exemption from employment laws.

Volunteers recruited, trained, or accepted by any department shall, to the extent of their volunteer service, be exempted from all provisions of law relative to state employment, hours of work, return or compensation, leave time, and employee benefits.

Volunteers shall, however, at all times comply with applicable work rules.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 42, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3703.

21-13-107. Meals, lodging, and transportation.

(1)Every department that utilizes the services of volunteers is authorized to provide volunteers with incidental reimbursements as are consistent with allowances authorized by law for reimbursement for state or local employees.

Such reimbursements include transportation costs, lodging, and subsistence, as the department deems appropriate, to assist volunteers in performing their duties, provided that sufficient funds are available.

(1)(A)Departments may furnish meals without charge to regular-service volunteers, provided that the scheduled work assignments of such volunteers extend over an established meal period.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 42, §§ 3, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3703, 12-3705; Acts 2019, No. 315, §§ 2335, 2336.

21-13-108. Liability insurance — Sovereign immunity.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 42, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3705; Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 103.

21-13-109. Employment experience.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 42, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3704; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2337.

21-13-110. Department reports or records.

Each department shall include in its annual report, or shall maintain in its files, information which may be developed and maintained by volunteers relating to:

The total number, location, and duties of all volunteers, including regular-service volunteers, occasional-service volunteers, and material donors;

The total number of annual hours of service provided to the department by all volunteers, including regular-service volunteers, occasional-service volunteers, and material donors; and

Reimbursements made to volunteers or material donors for expenses, transportation, or other costs incurred in connection with volunteer services, and such other records as may be required, for tax purposes, to authenticate services rendered and expenses incurred by volunteers or material donors for which reimbursement has not been made.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 42, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3706.

21-13-111. State income tax deductions — Definition.

In computing net income for the purpose of the Arkansas income tax levied by § 26-51-201, there shall be allowed as deductions, in addition to all other deductions allowed by law:

A deduction for mileage for necessary travel in connection with voluntary service to a department, at the rate provided by law or appropriate travel rule applicable to travel made by paid employees of a department for a volunteer who uses his or her personal motor vehicles for official travel, for which the volunteer has not received reimbursement from public funds; and

A deduction for unreimbursed meals, lodging, and transportation other than mileage as noted above, or other out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the volunteer in voluntary service to a department for which he or she has not received reimbursement from public funds, but which would be reimbursable if incurred by paid employees of a department acting within the scope of their employment; and

A deduction for mileage traveled in the use of a personal motor vehicle and for expenses incurred for meals, lodging, and transportation expenses other than mileage, and other out-of-pocket expenses incurred by a volunteer for volunteer work for a charitable organization for which reimbursement has not been received shall be allowed in the same amount and for the same purposes as now allowed under the state income tax laws applicable to business expenses.

As used in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, “charitable organization” shall include, in addition to a department, any private nonprofit corporation, association, or group which is recognized by the laws of this state as performing a nonprofit charitable purpose benefiting citizens of this state.

It is the purpose and intent of this section that deduction for expenses incurred by volunteers in connection with the performance of voluntary services for charitable organizations in this state and for public agencies and departments as authorized in this chapter shall be deductible in computing net income under the Arkansas individual income tax law, for the same purposes and in the same manner as now provided by the state income tax law applicable to business expenses in computing net income for state income tax purposes.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1981, No. 42, § 9, provided that this section should be applicable for the tax year commencing January 1, 1981, or for any tax year commencing in 1981, if the taxpayer reports income for a tax year other than a calendar year, and for each such tax year thereafter.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a)(1)(A).

Cross References. Income tax deductions, §26-51-415 —26-51-430.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Due to the addition of Subchapter 2 by Acts 1995, No. 200, the preexisting provisions of this chapter have been designated as Subchapter 1.

Cross References. Fees, §21-6-309.

Official of bank may act as notary, §23-48-324.

Am. Jur. 58 Am. Jur. 2d, Notaries, § 1 et seq.

C.J.S. 66 C.J.S., Notaries, § 1 et seq.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Due to the addition of Subchapter 2 of this chapter by Acts 1995, No. 200, the preexisting provisions of this chapter have been designated as Subchapter 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 1874, No. 17, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1891, No. 35, § 3: effective 60 days after passage.

Acts 1905, No. 269, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1983, No. 21, § 3: Feb. 3, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is unclear under present law whether the Secretary of State may transfer the commission of a notary public from one county to another upon the change of residence of notaries public; that such authority should immediately be granted the Secretary of State; and that this Act is immediately necessary to grant such authority. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 304, § 6: Mar. 2, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the fees currently prescribed by law to be charged by notaries for their services are outdated and are not sufficient to compensate notaries public for their services; that the current laws relating to notaries public do not require applicants for a notary commission to post a bond to assure that they perform their duties as a notary in accordance with law; that this act is designed to increase fees for notary services and to require notaries to file a bond at the time of making application for a notary commission and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 1274, § 8: Apr. 4, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the notary public law needs to be updated and reformed immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 2274, § 5, provided: “This act shall become effective on January 1, 2006.”

That he or she is:

One (1) of the following:

A bona fide citizen of the United States;

A permanent resident alien who shall file with his or her application a recorded Declaration of Domicile;

A legal resident of Arkansas;

A legal resident of an adjoining state and employed or operating a business in the State of Arkansas; or

(a)A nonresident spouse of a United States military service member employed or operating a business in Arkansas.

One (1) copy of a United States Department of Defense DD Form 1173 or a United States Department of Defense DD Form 1173-1, otherwise known as a “Uniformed Services Identification and Privilege Card”, shall be included with his or her application under this subsection;

Eighteen (18) years of age or older; and

Able to read and write English;

The address of his or her place of employment, business, or residence in this state;

That during the past ten (10) years, his or her commission as a notary public has not been revoked; and

That he or she has not been convicted of a felony.

The application shall be sent to the Secretary of State with a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for the notary public commission.

The Secretary of State may require the applicant to demonstrate that he or she has reviewed the law concerning notaries public and understands the duties of a notary public.

Every notary public shall file in the office of the recorder of deeds for the county where the notary public resides or in the case of a resident of an adjoining state or nonresident spouse of a United States military service member, in the county in Arkansas of his or her place of employment or business, either:

A surety bond executed by a surety insurer authorized to do business in Arkansas to the state for the faithful discharge of the notary public's duties in the sum of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), to be approved by the Secretary of State; or

A surety contract guaranteeing the notary public's faithful discharge of his or her duties executed to the State of Arkansas for not more than an aggregate seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), issued by a general business corporation validly organized and formed under the laws of this state pertaining to domestic corporations and which:

Has previously registered with the Insurance Commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner evidencing the corporation's purpose to issue only surety contracts for notaries public pursuant to the provisions of this section;

Has previously deposited and thereafter maintains with the commissioner securities in the sum of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) executed to the State of Arkansas that are issued by a nonaffiliated corporate entity and are approved by the commissioner; and

Is not otherwise transacting any insurance business in this state that requires compliance with the provisions of the Arkansas Insurance Code.

The obligation of an issuer of a bond required by subsection (e) of this section:

Shall be solely to the State of Arkansas; and

Is solely for the benefit of the State of Arkansas.

Under no circumstances shall the aggregate liability of the issuer exceed the amount of the bond.

An employer shall not cancel a surety bond of a current or former employee even if the employer paid for the surety bond on behalf of the employee.

Every notary public shall sign the following declaration in the presence of the circuit clerk for the county where the notary public resides or if a resident of another state or a nonresident spouse of a United States military service member, the circuit clerk for the county in Arkansas of his or her place of employment or business:

“I, (name of notary), solemnly swear or affirm that I have carefully read the notary laws of this state, and I will uphold the Constitutions of the United States and the State of Arkansas and will faithfully perform to the best of my ability all notarial acts in accordance with the law. (Signature of notary)

Subscribed and sworn to before me (name of circuit clerk), Circuit Clerk for the County of (name of county), State of Arkansas, on this ________ day of ______, (year).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 42, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3707; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2338.